Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1605
Commitment and bail; law applicable.

Any person who may, according to law, be committed to jail or become recognized or held to bail with sureties for his appearance in court to answer to any indictment, may in like manner be committed to jail or become recognized and held to bail for his appearance, to answer to any information or indictment, as the case may be.

Laws 1885, c. 108, § 5, p. 398;

R.S.1913, § 9066;

C.S.1922, § 10090;

C.S.1929, § 29-1605;

R.S.1943, § 29-1605.